Louisiana, session 2026, HB250.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:1124.2(C)(9)(e) and 1124.2.1(C)(7)(a) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 42:1114(F) and 1114.3(F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1114. Financial disclosure
* * *
F. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection A of this Section, a member
of the immediate family of an appointed member of a board or commission shall not
be required to disclose information required by this Section.
* * *
§1114.3. Disaster or emergency contracts; prohibition; disclosure
* * *
F. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection B of this Section, a member
of the immediate family of an appointed member of a board or commission shall not
be required to disclose information required by this Section.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 250 ENROLLED
§1124.2. Financial disclosure; certain elected officials; members of certain boards
and commissions; ethics administrator
* * *
C. The financial statement required by this Section shall be filed on a form
prescribed by the Board of Ethics and shall include the following information:
* * *
(9) The name and address of each creditor, and name of each guarantor, if
any, to whom the individual or spouse owes any liability which exceeds ten thousand
dollars on the last day of the reporting period excluding:
* * *
(e) Any loan from an immediate family member, unless such family member
is a registered lobbyist, or his principal or employer is a registered lobbyist, or he
employs or is a principal of a registered lobbyist, or unless such family member has
a contract with the state.
* * *
§1124.2.1. Financial disclosure; members of boards and commissions
* * *
C. The financial statement required by this Section shall be filed on a form
prescribed by the Board of Ethics and shall include the following information:
* * *
(7) One of the following:
(a) A certification that neither the individual nor any member of his
immediate family has not had a personal or financial interest in any entity, contract,
or business or a personal or financial relationship that in any way posed a conflict of
interest which affected the impartial performance of the individual's duties as a
member of the board or commission.
* * *
Section 2. Act No. 190 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be given
retroactive application to January 1, 2023.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 250 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.